Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.010

Finding. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

The legislature recognizes that the state as a whole benefits from investment in public infrastructure because it promotes community and economic development. Public investment stimulates business activity and helps create jobs; stimulates the redevelopment of brownfields and blighted areas in the inner city; lowers the cost of housing; and promotes efficient land use. The legislature finds that these activities generate revenue for the state and that it is in the public interest to invest in these projects through a credit against the state sales and use tax and an allocation of property tax revenue to those sponsoring local governments that can demonstrate the expected returns to the state.

[ 2006 c 181 s 101.]